Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.132 is amended to read:
455.132. (1) There  is established in the Department of Consumer and Business Services a Build-
ing Codes Structures Board consisting of [ nine] 11 members.
(2) The Building Codes Structures Board shall assist the Director of the Department  of Con-
sumer and  Business Services in administering the structural, prefabricated structures and energy
programs described in this chapter and  the accessibility to persons with physical disabilities pro-
gram described in ORS 447.210 to 447.280.
(3) The board shall consist of members  broadly representative of the industries and professions
involved in the development and construction of buildings and energy conservation, including:
(a) An architect [ or engineer ];
(b) A general contractor, as defined in ORS 701.005, specializing in the construction of  buildings
more than three stories above grade;
(c) A contractor specializing in construction for heavy industry;
(d) A representative of the building trade;
(e) A representative of a utility or energy supplier;
(f) A representative of a fire protection agency;
(g) A building official;
(h) An owner or manager of a commercial office building; [ and]
(i) A representative  selected from individuals recommended by the Oregon Disabilities
Commission[.];
(j) A fire protection engineer; and
(k) A structural engineer,  certified or registered under ORS 672.107, specializing in the
design of residential buildings more than three stories above grade.
Enrolled Senate Bill 49 (SB 49-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 49 (SB 49-A) Page 2